Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.050

General powers not restricted by express enumeration.

The enumeration in RCW 7.24.020 and 7.24.030 does not limit or restrict the exercise of the general powers conferred in RCW 7.24.010, in any proceeding where declaratory relief is sought, in which a judgment or decree will terminate the controversy or remove an uncertainty.

[ 1985 c 9 s 2. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 3; 1935 c 113 s 5; RRS s 784-5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 1985 c 9 reenacted RCW 7.24.050 without amendment.

Short title—Application—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 and 11.02.901.

Purpose—Reenactment—1985 c 9: "The purpose of this act is to make technical corrections to chapter 149, Laws of 1984, and to ensure that the changes made in that chapter meet the constitutional requirements of Article II, section 19 of the state Constitution." [ 1985 c 9 s 1.]

Severability—1985 c 9: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 9 s 4.]

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.